District of Columbia statutes.
9-105.04

Plats showing relocation of Michigan Avenue.

The Surveyor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to prepare the necessary plat or plats showing all parcels of land to be transferred in accordance with the provisions of §§ 9-101.15 and 9-105.01 to 9-105.04, with a certificate affixed thereon to be signed by the parties in interest making the necessary transfers; which plat and certificate, after being signed by the various interested parties and approved by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, shall be recorded upon order of said Mayor in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia; and said plat or plats, when duly recorded in said Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, shall constitute a legal transfer of title of the various parcels to the parties in interest according to the provisions contained in §§ 9-101.15 and 9-105.01 to 9-105.04.

History

Mar. 4, 1929, 45 Stat. 1544, ch. 682, § 4

Cross References

Recordkeeping, maps, charts, and surveys of streets and highways, see § 1-1306.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-130.
1973 Ed., § 7-130.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.